tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.aff
SFX U Y 120
SFX U   ar    ármelo      ar
SFX U   ar    ártelo      ar
SFX U   ar    árselo      ar
SFX U   ar    árnoslo     ar
SFX U   ar    ároslo      ar
SFX U   ar    ármela      ar
SFX U   ar    ártela      ar
SFX U   ar    ársela      ar
SFX U   ar    árnosla     ar
SFX U   ar    árosla      ar
SFX U   ar    ármelos     ar
SFX U   ar    ártelos     ar
SFX U   ar    árselos     ar
SFX U   ar    árnoslos    ar
SFX U   ar    ároslos     ar
SFX U   ar    ármelas     ar
SFX U   ar    ártelas     ar
SFX U   ar    árselas     ar
SFX U   ar    árnoslas    ar
SFX U   ar    ároslas     ar
SFX U   ar    ándomelo    ar
SFX U   ar    ándotelo    ar
SFX U   ar    ándoselo    ar
SFX U   ar    ándonoslo   ar
SFX U   ar    ándooslo    ar
SFX U   ar    ándomela    ar
SFX U   ar    ándotela    ar
SFX U   ar    ándosela    ar
SFX U   ar    ándonosla   ar
SFX U   ar    ándoosla    ar
SFX U   ar    ándomelos   ar
SFX U   ar    ándotelos   ar
SFX U   ar    ándoselos   ar
SFX U   ar    ándonoslos  ar
SFX U   ar    ándooslos   ar
SFX U   ar    ándomelas   ar
SFX U   ar    ándotelas   ar
SFX U   ar    ándoselas   ar
SFX U   ar    ándonoslas  ar
SFX U   ar    ándooslas   ar
SFX U   er    érmelo      er
SFX U   er    értelo      er
SFX U   er    érselo      er
SFX U   er    érnoslo     er
SFX U   er    éroslo      er
SFX U   er    érmela      er
SFX U   er    értela      er
SFX U   er    érsela      er
SFX U   er    érnosla     er
SFX U   er    érosla      er
SFX U   er    érmelos     er
SFX U   er    értelos     er
SFX U   er    érselos     er
SFX U   er    érnoslos    er
SFX U   er    éroslos     er
SFX U   er    érmelas     er
SFX U   er    értelas     er
SFX U   er    érselas     er
SFX U   er    érnoslas    er
SFX U   er    éroslas     er
SFX U   er    iéndomelo   er
SFX U   er    iéndotelo   er
SFX U   er    iéndoselo   er
SFX U   er    iéndonoslo  er
SFX U   er    iéndooslo   er
SFX U   er    iéndomela   er
SFX U   er    iéndotela   er
SFX U   er    iéndosela   er
SFX U   er    iéndonosla  er
SFX U   er    iéndoosla   er
SFX U   er    iéndomelos  er
SFX U   er    iéndotelos  er
SFX U   er    iéndoselos  er
SFX U   er    iéndonoslos er
SFX U   er    iéndooslos  er
SFX U   er    iéndomelas  er
SFX U   er    iéndotelas  er
SFX U   er    iéndoselas  er
SFX U   er    iéndonoslas er
SFX U   er    iéndooslas  er
SFX U   ir    írmelo      ir
SFX U   ir    írtelo      ir
SFX U   ir    írselo      ir
SFX U   ir    írnoslo     ir
SFX U   ir    íroslo      ir
SFX U   ir    írmela      ir
SFX U   ir    írtela      ir
SFX U   ir    írsela      ir
SFX U   ir    írnosla     ir
SFX U   ir    írosla      ir
SFX U   ir    írmelas     ir
SFX U   ir    írtelas     ir
SFX U   ir    írselas     ir
SFX U   ir    írnoslas    ir
SFX U   ir    íroslas     ir
SFX U   ir    írmelos     ir
SFX U   ir    írtelos     ir
SFX U   ir    írselos     ir
SFX U   ir    írnoslos    ir
SFX U   ir    íroslos     ir
SFX U   r     éndomelo    ir
SFX U   r     éndotelo    ir
SFX U   r     éndoselo    ir
SFX U   r     éndonoslo   ir
SFX U   r     éndooslo    ir
SFX U   r     éndomela    ir
SFX U   r     éndotela    ir
SFX U   r     éndosela    ir
SFX U   r     éndonosla   ir
SFX U   r     éndoosla    ir
SFX U   r     éndomelos   ir
SFX U   r     éndotelos   ir
SFX U   r     éndoselos   ir
SFX U   r     éndonoslos  ir
SFX U   r     éndooslos   ir
SFX U   r     éndomelas   ir
SFX U   r     éndotelas   ir
SFX U   r     éndoselas   ir
SFX U   r     éndonoslas  ir
SFX U   r     éndooslas   ir
