tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.dic
abrir/IOQRTUVWY
absolver/OQRTUWY
acariciar/LOPQRSTUVX
aceptar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
acercar/IOPQRSTUVWX
acertar/ILNOPQRSTUWX
aclarar/HOPQRSTUVWX
acoger/IOQRTUVWX
activar/HOPQRSTUVWX
actualizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
adaptar/HOPQRSTUVWX
adjudicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
adjuntar/OPQRSTUVWX
afirmar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
agenciar/OPQRSTUVX
agradecer/IOQRTUWX
agrupar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
alcanzar/LOPQRSTUVWX
alejar/IOPQRSTUVWX
aliviar/OPQRSTUVX
almacenar/IOPQRSTUVWX
alquilar/IOPQRSTUVWX
ampliar/HOPQRSTUWX
analizar/OPQRSTUVWX
anotar/HOPQRSTUVWX
antecoger/OQRTUVWX
anular/HOPQRSTUVWX
apagar/IOPQRSTUVWX
aparatar/OPQRSTUVWX
apartar/IOPQRSTUVWX
apañar/IOPQRSTUVWX
aplicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
apostillar/OPQRSTUVWX
apoyar/OPQRSTUVWX
apreciar/HOPQRSTUVX
aprender/OQRTUVX
apropiar/HNOPQRSTUVX
apuntar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
arrancar/IOPQRSTUVWX
arrebatar/IOPQRSTUVWX
arreglar/OPQRSTUVWX
asegurar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
asignar/HOPQRSTUVWX
asociar/HIOPQRSTUVX
atar/OPQRSTUVWX
atravesar/OPQRSTUWX
aumentar/OPQRSTUVX
añadir/OQRTUVWX
bloquear/LOPQRSTUVWX
borrar/OPQRSTUVWX
buscar/OPQRSTUVWX
calcular/HOPQRSTUVWX
calentar/IOPQRSTUWX
calibrar/HOPQRSTUVWX
calificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
cambiar/ILOPQRSTUVX
cancelar/HOPQRSTUVX
capturar/OPQRSTUVWX
cargar/LOPQRSTUVWX
catalogar/HOPQRSTUVX
centrar/OPQRSTUVWX
cerrar/IOPQRSTUWX
clasificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
clavar/OPQRSTUVWX
cobrar/OPQRSTUVWX
codificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
cofinanciar/OPQRSTUVX
coger/OQRTUVWX
colgar/ILOPQRSTUWX
colocar/HOPQRSTUVX
combinar/HOPQRSTUVWX
comentar/OPQRSTUVX
comer/OQRTUVWX
compactar/HOPQRSTUVWX
comparar/HOPQRSTUVWX
compensar/HOPQRSTUVX
complementar/OPQRSTUVX
completar/OPQRSTUVX
complicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
componer/OQRTUWY
comprar/LOPQRSTUVWX
comprobar/HLOPQRSTUWX
computar/HOPQRSTUVWX
comunicar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
concatenar/HOPQRSTUVWX
conceder/OQRTUVX
concretar/OPQRSTUVX
conectar/OPQRSTUVWX
confeccionar/OPQRSTUVX
configurar/HOPQRSTUVWX
confirmar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
conservar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
consolidar/HOPQRSTUVWX
consultar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
contabilizar/OPQRSTUVWX
contar/LOPQRSTUWX
controlar/OPQRSTUVX
contusionar/OPQRSTUVX
convalidar/HOPQRSTUVWX
copiar/LOPQRSTUVX
cortar/LOPQRSTUVX
crear/HOPQRSTUVWX
cuantificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
cubrir/HIOQRTUVWY
dar/HOQRTUX
deber/NOQRSTUVWX
decodificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
dedicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
dejar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
deletrear/OPQRSTUVWX
demostrar/HOPQRSTUWX
desagrupar/OPQRSTUVWX
desapartar/OPQRSTUVWX
desarrollar/OPQRSTUVX
desbloquear/OPQRSTUVWX
descodificar/OPQRSTUVWX
descoger/OQRTUVWX
descomponer/OQRTUWY
descontar/OPQRSTUWX
describir/OQRTUVWY
desechar/OPQRSTUVWX
desencerrar/OPQRSTUWX
desencoger/IOQRTUVWX
desencolar/OPQRSTUVX
desenvolver/IOQRTUWY
desgarrar/IOPQRSTUVWX
deshacer/OQRTUWY
designar/HOPQRSTUVWX
desinfectar/LOPQRSTUVWX
desinhibir/OQRTUVWX
desplazar/IOPQRSTUVWX
despreciar/OPQRSTUVX
detectar/OPQRSTUVWX
devolver/OQRTUWY
dibujar/LOPQRSTUVWX
dictar/OPQRSTUVWX
diferenciar/HOPQRSTUVX
direccionar/IOPQRSTUVX
dirigir/OQRTUVWX
diseñar/OPQRSTUVWX
distinguir/OQRTUVWXYZ
dividir/OQRTUVWX
documentar/HOPQRSTUVX
dominar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
donar/HLOPQRSTUVX
dotar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
duplicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
echar/IOPQRSTUVWX
editar/OPQRSTUVWX
ejecutar/LOPQRSTUVWX
elevar/HINOPQRSTUVX
eliminar/HOPQRSTUVWX
empezar/OPQRSTUWX
emplear/OPQRSTUVWX
emular/HOPQRSTUVWX
encender/IOQRTUWX
encerrar/IOPQRSTUWX
encoger/IOQRTUVWX
encolar/IOPQRSTUVX
encontrar/OPQRSTUWX
enfocar/OPQRSTUVX
enfrentar/IOPQRSTUVX
englobar/OPQRSTUVX
ensamblar/OPQRSTUVWX
enseñar/ILOPQRSTUVWX
entrecoger/OQRTUVWX
entregar/IOPQRSTUVX
entrelazar/IOPQRSTUVWX
enumerar/HOPQRSTUVWX
enviar/OPQRSTUWX
envolver/IOQRTUWY
escoger/IOQRTUVWX
escribir/LOQRTUVWY
especificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
esposar/OPQRSTUVX
espulgar/OPQRSTUVWX
espurriar/OPQRSTUVX
espurrir/OQRTUVWX
esquebrajar/OPQRSTUVWX
esquematizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
esquiciar/OPQRSTUVX
esquifar/OPQRSTUVWX
esquilar/OPQRSTUVWX
esquilmar/OPQRSTUVWX
esquinar/LOPQRSTUVWX
esquinzar/OPQRSTUVWX
esquivar/OPQRSTUVWX
estabilizar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
establear/OPQRSTUVWX
establecer/IOQRTUWX
estabular/HOPQRSTUVWX
estacionar/IOPQRSTUVX
estafar/OPQRSTUVWX
estambrar/OPQRSTUVWX
estampar/HOPQRSTUVWX
estampillar/OPQRSTUVWX
estancar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
estantalar/OPQRSTUVWX
estebar/OPQRSTUVWX
esterar/OPQRSTUVWX
estercolar/IOPQRSTUVX
estereotipar/OPQRSTUVWX
estezar/OPQRSTUVX
estibar/OPQRSTUVWX
estimar/HOPQRSTUVWX
estimular/LOPQRSTUVWX
estipendiar/OPQRSTUVX
estipticar/OPQRSTUVWX
estipular/HOPQRSTUVWX
estirajar/OPQRSTUVWX
estirar/IOPQRSTUVWX
estirazar/OPQRSTUVWX
estofar/OPQRSTUVWX
estomagar/OPQRSTUVWX
estoquear/OPQRSTUVWX
estorbar/OPQRSTUVWX
estornudar/OPQRSTUVWX
estovar/OPQRSTUVX
estozar/OPQRSTUVWX
estozolar/OPQRSTUVX
estrangular/HIOPQRSTUVWX
estratificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
estrechar/IOPQRSTUVWX
estregar/IOPQRSTUVX
estrellar/IOPQRSTUVWX
estriar/HOPQRSTUWX
estribar/HOPQRSTUVWX
estropear/OPQRSTUVWX
estructurar/HOPQRSTUVWX
estrujar/IOPQRSTUVWX
estudiar/LOPQRSTUVX
estufar/OPQRSTUVWX
estuprar/OPQRSTUVWX
esturar/OPQRSTUVWX
eternizar/OPQRSTUVWX
evacuar/HLOPQRSTUVX
evadir/OQRTUVWX
evaluar/HOPQRSTUWX
evaporar/HOPQRSTUVX
evidenciar/OPQRSTUVX
evocar/HOPQRSTUVX
exacerbar/HIOPQRSTUVX
exaltar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
excavar/HOPQRSTUVWX
excepcionar/OPQRSTUVX
excitar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
exculpar/HOPQRSTUVWX
exentar/OPQRSTUVX
exhortar/HOPQRSTUVX
eximir/OQRTUVWX
exorar/OPQRSTUVX
expansionar/OPQRSTUVX
expectorar/HLOPQRSTUVX
explicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
expoliar/HOPQRSTUVX
expropiar/HOPQRSTUVX
expurgar/HOPQRSTUVWX
extender/OQRTUWX
extinguir/OQRTUVWXY
extravasar/HOPQRSTUVWX
extrañar/IOPQRSTUVWX
fabricar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
facturar/HOPQRSTUVWX
fajar/IOPQRSTUVWX
fallar/OPQRSTUVWX
fastidiar/OPQRSTUVX
fecundar/HOPQRSTUVX
federar/HOPQRSTUVWX
fermentar/HOPQRSTUVX
fichar/OPQRSTUVWX
filar/OPQRSTUVWX
filosofar/OPQRSTUVWX
finalizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
firmar/LOPQRSTUVWX
fisgar/OPQRSTUVWX
flagelar/HLOPQRSTUVX
flotar/HILOPQRSTUVWX
follar/OPQRSTUVWX
forjar/OPQRSTUVWX
formar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
fornicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
fortificar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
fotocopiar/OPQRSTUVX
fraccionar/INOPQRSTUVX
fragmentar/HOPQRSTUVX
fregar/IOPQRSTUWX
fresar/OPQRSTUVX
frotar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
fulminar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
fundamentar/OPQRSTUVX
fundir/HOQRTUVWX
gafar/OPQRSTUVWX
ganar/OPQRSTUVWX
garantizar/OPQRSTUVWX
gasificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
generalizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
gesticular/HLOPQRSTUVWX
girar/LOPQRSTUVWX
gloriar/OPQRSTUVX
golpear/OPQRSTUVWX
granular/HOPQRSTUVWX
haber/LOQRSTUX
identificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
imaginar/HOPQRSTUVWX
imponer/OQRTUWY
incorporar/HOPQRSTUVX
indicar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
ingeniar/OPQRSTUVX
inmovilizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
inscribir/OQRTUVWY
insinuar/HLOPQRSTUWX
integrar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
intercambiar/OPQRSTUVX
interconectar/OPQRSTUVWX
interpretar/HOPQRSTUVX
interrumpir/NOQRTUVWX
inventar/OPQRSTUVX
jugar/OPQRSTUWX
lamer/OQRTUVWX
liberar/HOPQRSTUVWX
limpiar/OPQRSTUVX
llenar/OPQRSTUVWX
machacar/LOPQRSTUVWX
manejar/OPQRSTUVWX
masturbar/HOPQRSTUVWX
matizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
menear/OPQRSTUVWX
meter/IOQRTUVWX
minimizar/HOPQRSTUVWX
modificar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
mostrar/HOPQRSTUWX
multiplicar/HOPQRSTUVWX
notificar/HOPQRSTUVWX
ocultar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
ofertar/OPQRSTUVX
ordenar/HILNOPQRSTUVWX
pagar/OPQRSTUVWX
parecer/OQRSTUWX
pasar/LOPQRSTUVWX
perder/IOQRTUWX
permitir/OQRTUVWX
pintar/OPQRSTUVWX
plantar/HOPQRSTUVWX
poner/ILOQRTUWY
preguntar/OPQRSTUVWX
presentar/HOPQRSTUVWX
prestar/HLOPQRSTUVX
procesar/IOPQRSTUVX
prohibir/HOQRTUWX
proponer/OQRTUWY
proteger/OQRTUVWX
quemar/ILOPQRSTUVWX
rascar/IOPQRSTUVWX
reajustar/OPQRSTUVWX
rebautizar/OPQRSTUVWX
recambiar/OPQRSTUVX
recibir/IOQRTUVWX
reclamar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
recoger/INOQRTUVWX
recompilar/HOPQRSTUVWX
recordar/HOPQRSTUWX
recuperar/HOPQRSTUVWX
rediseñar/OPQRSTUVWX
reemplazar/ILOPQRSTUVWX
refinar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
regalar/IOPQRSTUVWX
regrabar/OPQRSTUVWX
reinstalar/HOPQRSTUVWX
reintentar/OPQRSTUVX
remitir/OQRTUVWX
reparar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
replantear/IOPQRSTUVWX
reservar/HNOPQRSTUVWX
resumir/NOQRTUVWX
retirar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
retratar/HOPQRSTUVWX
reunir/OQRTUWX
revisar/OPQRSTUVWX
romper/ILOQRTUVWY
sacudir/IOQRTUVWX
salvar/HILOPQRSTUVWX
separar/HNOPQRSTUVWX
sobreescribir/OQRTUVWY
solicitar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
solucionar/OPQRSTUVX
soportar/OPQRSTUVX
subrayar/OPQRSTUVWX
sumar/OPQRSTUVWX
suprimir/OQRTUVWX
suspender/OQRTUVX
tocar/ILOPQRSTUVX
tragar/LOPQRSTUVWX
transmitir/OQRTUVWX
tratar/ILOPQRSTUVWX
usar/OPQRSTUVWX
variar/HLOPQRSTUWX
ventilar/HOPQRSTUVWX
